Utah statutes.
26-19-19.   Direct payment to the department by third party.

(1)  Any third party required to make payment to the department pursuant to this chapter shall make the payment directly to the department or its designee.

(2)  The department may negotiate a payment or payment instrument it receives in connection with Subsection (1) without the cosignature or other participation of the recipient or any other party.



Enacted by Chapter 145, 1998 General Session

